North Dakota, session 69, SB2114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 37-17.3-08 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Each county and city law enforcement department that accesses the North Dakota teletype
system shall pay a fee levied on a per terminal basis. Other law enforcement affiliated
organizations and federal agencies will pay one hundred percent of the actual costs incurred
by the division for providing the service. Fees will be levied on a per terminal basis. State
general fund agencies that access the system will not incur any fees for the service. City and
county law enforcement fees will beare based on the following schedule of charges per
terminal per month:
a. CountyFifteen percent of the fee established by the director in a county with a population
of less than five thousand shall pay forty dollars per month.
b. CountyThirty percent of the fee established by the director in a county with a population
of five thousand or more but less than ten thousand shall pay eighty dollars per month.
c. CountyForty-five percent of the fee established by the director in a county with a
population of ten thousand or more but less than fifteen thousand shall pay one hundred
twenty dollars per month.
d. CountySixty percent of the fee established by the director in a county with a population of
fifteen thousand or more but less than twenty-five thousand shall pay one hundred sixty
dollars per month.
e. CountySeventy-four percent of the fee established by the director in a county with a
population of twenty-five thousand or more shall pay two hundred dollars per month.

S. B. NO. 2114 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2114.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State